Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.230

Watershed restoration projects—Permit processing—Fish habitat enhancement project.

A permit required under this chapter for a watershed restoration project as defined in RCW 89.08.460 shall be processed in compliance with RCW 89.08.450 through 89.08.510. A fish habitat enhancement project meeting the criteria of RCW 77.55.181 shall be reviewed and approved according to the provisions of RCW 77.55.181.

[ 2014 c 120 s 10; 2003 c 39 s 15; 1998 c 249 s 5; 1995 c 378 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Report—Effective date—1998 c 249: See notes following RCW 77.55.181.